Hawaii statutes.
§147-60 Certificate, appeal to department.
Whenever any quantity of any food product has been inspected and certified
hereunder and a question arises as to whether the certificate issued therefor
shows the true grade, classification, quality, or conditions of the product,
any interested person, subject to such regulations as the department of
agriculture may prescribe, may appeal the question to the board of agriculture,
and the board may cause such investigation to be made and such tests to be
applied as it may deem necessary and determine and issue a finding as to the
true grade or classification of the product or the quality or condition
thereof. Whenever an appeal is taken to the board under this section it shall
charge, assess, and collect, or cause to be collected, a reasonable fee, to be
fixed by the board, which shall be refunded if the appeal is sustained. [L
1947, c 195, §10; RL 1955, §22-49; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 132,
§2; HRS §147-60]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next